Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201290-537
Department of Economic Development;
Tourism Promotion.

AGENCY NO. 72 — DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT

Program No. 618 - Tourism Promotion

FY2011-12
FY2012-13

GENERAL
FUND
250,000
-0-

CASH
FUND
4,214,556
-0-

FEDERAL
FUND est.
959,815
-0-

PROGRAM
TOTAL
5,424,371
-0-

SALARY
LIMIT
712,821
-0-

The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing
on June 30, 2011, is hereby reappropriated. The
unexpended General, Cash, and Federal Fund appropriation balances existing
on June 30, 2012, are hereby reappropriated to Agency 91, Program 618.

There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2011-12 $102,600 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2012-13 $-0- Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only
be used for such purpose.

There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2011-12 $250,000 General Funds, which shall be used by the Department of
Economic Development for advertising, marketing, and promotional efforts for
tourism activities and travel destinations. Such promotional activities shall
be representative of the statewide tourism economy and targeted toward external
markets in an effort to bring outside capital into the state. There is included
in the appropriation to this program for FY2012-13 $-0- General
Funds, which shall be used by the Department of Economic Development for advertising,
marketing, and promotional efforts for tourism activities and travel destinations.
Such promotional activities shall be representative of the statewide tourism
economy and targeted toward external markets in an effort to bring outside
capital into the state.

There is included in the appropriation to this program $250,000 Cash
Funds for FY2011-12 to provide funding for promotional and visitor development
activities related to the hosting of an Olympic Team Trial event and a United
States National Championship event by a city of the metropolitan class.

Laws 2012, LB968, § 61;

Laws 2012, LB1053A, § 1.
Changes made by LB968 became effective April 3, 2012. Changes made by LB1053A became operative July 1, 2012.